Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA HEALTH EQUITY INITIATIVES.new text end new text begin $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to increase health equity by implementing and expanding health care services in underserved communities through the Community-University Health Care Center, Mobile Health Initiative, and One Health Clinic. This appropriation must be used to integrate curriculum and experiential learning focused on underserved communities into current health-related academic programs; facilitate more health science student clinical training placements in underserved communities; expand the Mobile Health Initiative; and pilot a One Health Clinic offering interprofessional, multidisciplinary health care that recognizes the interconnectedness of humans, animals, and the environment. new text end